California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
 for by an additional permit fee. This additional fee shall be based on the estimated cost of the benefit to be conferred on the specific property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6073.

The permit fee shall be entered in the minutes of the board of supervisors who shall advise the board of directors of the district of the fee per acre required for the issuance of a permit. The board of directors shall collect this fee from the applicant for a permit to grow cotton in the district. The fees shall be paid into the county treasury for the use of the district. The board of directors may provide for the method and time of payment of the fees which may be monthly, quarterly, or as otherwise determined to be reasonable. The board of directors may provide for the refund of fees, or appropriate part thereof,
 collected from growers who have not grown any cotton or have grown less than that for which they have a permit, insofar as such a refund would not adversely affect the programs being conducted by the district.

The board of directors shall, at the close of the district’s fiscal year, refund any money not required for continuing programs that remains in the district fund on a pro rata basis to the persons from whom the fees being refunded were collected.

The board of directors shall pay the county or counties in which it is located the costs of county services performed at the request of the district. The district shall also reimburse the county or counties for services performed pursuant to Sections 6053, 6054, 6056, 6057, 6058, 6059, 6060, 6070, 6076, 6077, and 6081.

Petitioners for the formation of a cotton pest abatement district shall be assessed a fee by the commissioner in the
 amount necessary to cover any costs incurred as a result of duties performed by the commissioner under this chapter which are preparatory to the formation of a district if a district is not formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6074.

The treasury of the county shall be the repository of all the moneys of the district. The county treasurer shall receive and receipt for all of these moneys, and place the same to the credit of the district. Any interest earned on the district funds shall be the property of the district. The treasurer shall be responsible upon his or her official bond for the safekeeping and disbursement, in the manner herein provided, of all moneys of any such district so held by him or her. The county treasurer shall pay out the moneys of the district only upon warrants of the county auditor drawn upon the order of the board of
 directors of the district signed by the president of the board and attested by the secretary. The county treasurer shall report in writing on the first day of July, October, January, and March of each year, to the board of directors of each district in his or her county, the amount of money he or she then holds for the district, the amount of receipts since his or her last report, and the amounts paid out; and each report shall be verified and filed with the secretary of the district to whom it is addressed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6075.

The board of directors, when prohibiting the planting, growing, or maintenance of cotton plants within the boundaries of the district, shall notify persons affected by this action within 15 days. The grower within 30 days may appeal the decision of the board of directors to the board of supervisors, which may, by a majority decision, modify, or rescind the decision of the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6076.

In each cotton pests abatement district, a biennial election shall be held in March of each odd-numbered year by the county elections official of the county in which a majority of the acreage in the district is contained. Notice of the election, and of the offices to be filled, shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county once a week for three successive weeks before the first day of February. At the election a sufficient number of directors shall be elected to fill the places of those directors whose terms expire the first day of April
 immediately following the election.

The county elections official shall make declarations of candidacy available from between 113 and 88 days before the election. Any person eligible for the office of director, desiring to be a candidate for election, shall file a declaration with the county elections official on or before the 88th day before the election. The county elections official shall certify the qualified candidates and have ballots prepared and printed. The election shall be conducted, as nearly as practicable, in accordance with the general election laws of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6077.

The county elections official on or after the 29th day before the election shall mail a ballot, an identification envelope, and a stamped and addressed return envelope to each cottongrower on the register submitted by the agricultural commissioner. The ballot shall indicate the number of votes and the number shall be written on the ballot by the clerk. Each cottongrower appearing on the register shall be entitled to one vote for each acre of cotton for which a valid permit to grow cotton is possessed for each office to be
 filled, or proposition to be voted upon, at that election. Cumulative voting is not authorized.

The ballot shall be printed in substantially the following form:

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

 NOTICE OF INCOMPLETE TEXT: The Cotton Pest Abatement 
 District official ballot appears in the hard-copy publication of the 
 chaptered bill. See Sec. 25, Chapter 221, Statutes of 2002 (p. 946). 

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

The ballot shall be placed in the identification envelope by the voter after the voter has indicated his or her choices. The identification envelope shall be sealed and signed by the voter. The
 identification envelope shall be returned to the county elections official in the sealed return envelope.

Ballots in order to be counted shall be received by the elections official not later than 12 o’clock noon of the first Tuesday after the first Monday in March and the return envelopes containing the ballots shall not be opened until that time. The elections official shall then open the return envelopes and deposit the ballot in its unopened envelope in a ballot box. After deposit of all identification envelopes received, the elections official shall open the ballot box and count the votes cast and certify the results of the election.

The returns of the election shall be reported to the board of directors of the district who shall meet on the Monday following the election and canvass the returns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Note: See published chaptered bill for complete section text. The Cotton Pest Abatement District official ballot appeared on page 13 of Ch. 221, and now appears on page 946 in Vol. 1 of the 2002 Statutes publication.)
-------------------------------------------

6078.

The persons declared elected shall take the oath of office and file their official bonds with the county elections official on or before the first day of April following their election and shall take office at noon of that day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6079.

Any owner of land devoted to the growing of cotton in the county where the district is situated may file a petition for inclusion in the district with the board of directors of any cotton pests abatement district, and the land may, by order of the board of directors, be included within the district. A certified copy of each order of the board of directors including additional lands within the district shall be filed for record by the secretary of the district in the office of the county recorder of the county immediately upon passage by the board of directors, and each such order shall particularly describe each
 parcel of land to be included in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6080.

The board of directors of each cotton pests abatement district shall hold a regular meeting at least once each month at the time and place in the district designated by resolution of the board; and the board of directors of each district shall prescribe the rules and regulations for the conduct of its meetings and for calling and giving notice of special meetings of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6081.

Whenever the board of supervisors, by resolution, desires to dissolve the district, or whenever a petition, signed by not less than 25 percent of the cottongrowers within a district who are engaged in the growing of cotton, requesting the dissolution of the district is presented to and filed with the board of directors of the district, the board of directors shall submit the question of the dissolution of the district to the qualified voters of the district at the next biennial election of the district; provided, however, that the board of directors shall not be required to accept a petition for the dissolution of
 the district within 10 days preceding any biennial election of a district. If at the election 60 percent of the votes cast are in favor of the dissolution of the district, the directors of the district shall, within 60 days, file for recording in the office of the county recorder of the county a certified copy of an order declaring the district to be dissolved, and cease all activities, and shall proceed immediately to wind up the affairs of the district. The dissolution election procedures shall be the same as those contained in Sections 6076 and 6077.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6082.

At the expiration of 90 days after the election, the board of directors shall deliver on the basis of the ratio of the acreage devoted to cottongrowing in each county in the district all property and assets in their possession belonging to the district to the agricultural commissioner of each county in the district to be held and used for the benefit of cotton production. Any funds which may be in the hands of the county treasurer to the credit of the district or to which the district may thereafter become entitled shall be transferred to the credit of the county in which the district is located and shall be expended
 by the board of supervisors for the benefit of cotton production.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6083.

All claims and accounts against the district which have not been settled by the board of directors within 90 days after the election authorizing the dissolution of the district shall be presented to the board of supervisors of the county in which the district was located and shall be passed and approved by them in the same manner as county claims and shall be paid out of the funds of the dissolved district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6084.

In the event that there are insufficient funds to discharge all claims and accounts brought pursuant to Section 6083, the board of supervisors shall, at the time of levying the next general county taxes, make a special assessment upon the net acreage devoted to the growing of cotton which was benefited from the dissolved district sufficient in amount to discharge all outstanding claims and accounts against the district. Properties which received special benefits for which additional permit fees where paid in the last year of district operation shall have an additional pro rata charge made upon the net acreage
 affected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective May 3, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

6085.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Cotton Pests Abatement District Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Caprifigs and Caprifig Trees [6101. - 6177.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [6101. - 6106.]

6101.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6102.

“Blanks” means caprifigs which are devoid of Blastophaga insects or galls that contain Blastophaga insects.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6103.

“Mamme” crop means the winter crop of caprifigs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6104.

“Matured pollen” means pollen in a powdery condition which can be dusted or shaken out from the anthers in appreciable quantities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6105.

“Profichi crops” means the crop of caprifigs which matures in June and July and is used to caprify or pollinate the main crop of the Smyrna type of figs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6106.

“Spent figs” means caprifigs from which all the female Blastophaga insects have issued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Enforcement [6131. - 6134.]

6131.

The commissioner shall enforce this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6132.

The commissioner may enter any place where caprifigs are produced, packed, stored, shipped, delivered for shipment, or sold, and inspect them. He may seize and hold for evidence any caprifigs which are packed, shipped, delivered for shipment, or sold in violation of any provision of this chapter, and prosecute actions for any such violation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6133.

The board of supervisors of any county may receive and accept on behalf of the county, any contribution or donation of money from a person or from any agency of this state or of the United States for the purpose of enforcing this chapter. Any money which is so received shall be credited to the budget of the commissioner and shall be expended solely for such enforcement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6134.

It is unlawful for any person to willfully or otherwise interfere with the enforcement of any provision of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Caprifigs [6151. - 6157.]

6151.

Caprifigs, unless properly treated, contribute to, and are responsible for, the transmission of endosepsis and other plant diseases by the blastophaga which the figs contain.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6152.

Every person who owns, raises, uses, packs, ships, or delivers for shipment or sells any caprifigs of the mamme crop for use within the county, shall treat such figs by a method which is approved by the commissioner for the prevention or elimination of endosepsis or the transmission of endosepsis by the blastophaga in the figs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6153.

If any caprifigs of the mamme crop are to be shipped or used outside the county, the person that owns, raises, uses, packs, ships or delivers them for shipment shall notify the commissioner of the county within which the figs are to be used of all of the following:

(a) The shipment.

(b) The nature of the shipment.

(c) The name and residence of the consignee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6154.

After the notice, the commissioner shall require the consignee to properly treat the figs for the prevention or elimination of endosepsis before using them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6155.

It is unlawful for any person to violate Section 6152, 6153, or 6154.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6156.

It is unlawful for any person to pack, ship, deliver for shipment, or sell in any container any caprifigs of the profichi crop which violate any of the following:

(a) Do not contain matured pollen.

(b) Do not contain living Blastophaga insect in the adult stage.

(c) Contain more than 25 percent of spent figs.

(d) Contain more than 10 percent of blanks.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6157.

It is unlawful for any person to pack, ship, deliver for shipment or sell in any container any caprifigs of the mamme crop, which contain more than 25 percent of spent figs, or more than 10 percent of blanks.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Caprifig Trees [6171. - 6177.]

6171.

Caprifig trees, unless properly controlled and regulated under supervision, constitute a menace because they are a source of infection and pests.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6172.

Except as otherwise provided by Section 6173, in the interest of the public welfare and general prosperity of the state and to provide for the control, eradication, elimination, and prevention of endosepsis and other plant diseases, all caprifig trees used for shade, ornamental, or decorative purposes, and caprifig trees in, or associated with, any fig orchard which produces calimyrna or other Smyrna-type figs that aggregate in number more than one and one-half percent of the fig trees in the orchard, are unlawful and a public nuisance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6173.

Every commercial grower of calimyrna or other Smyrna-type fig may maintain at least one caprifig tree in connection with his planting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6174.

The commissioner shall notify the owner of any fig tree which is a public nuisance under Section 6172 to graft or destroy it within a time which is specified in the notice.

He may furnish to the owner, at the time of serving the notice, instructions for application of methods by the owner which are best designed to accomplish the purposes of the notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6175.

If the owner does not destroy or graft the fig tree within the time which is specified in the notice, the commissioner shall cause the grafting or destruction of the tree, at the expense of the owner, in a summary manner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6176.

A calimyrna grower, regardless of the size of his holdings, shall follow the standard procedures for cleanup of caprifig trees by picking the mamme caprifigs before the wasps begin to issue. He shall treat the mamme caprifigs which are picked with a fungicide, according to recognized procedures.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6177.

The presence of both mamme and set profichi figs in the caprifig trees at the same time is a public nuisance. The caprifigs, or the trees, or both, shall be destroyed at the owner’s expense by the owner or by the commissioner, pursuant to this article, before the profichi caprifig crop matures.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Winegrape Pest and Disease Control District Law [6200. - 6290.]



  ARTICLE 1. Findings and Definitions [6200. - 6202.]

6200.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California is the leading producer of wine in the United States, accounting for 72 percent of all wine, foreign and domestic, consumed in this country.

(b) Winegrapes are grown in virtually every county for processing by more than 800 wineries located throughout the state.

(c) California grows more than 327,455 acres of winegrapes producing 2,570,707 tons of grapes per year valued at more than seven hundred eighteen million dollars ($718,000,000), as of 1990, with a direct and indirect impact on the state’s economy totaling more than eight billion six hundred million dollars ($8,600,000,000).

(d) Destructive pests and diseases, including phylloxera, pose a significant and imminent threat to the state’s important grape and wine industry.

(e) Phylloxera has already infested grape acreage in many California counties, including Napa and Sonoma, resulting in losses totaling two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) to growers and the wine industry.

(f) The state has an interest in protecting its agricultural products from further destruction by phylloxera and other harmful pests and diseases.

(g) To avoid a potentially catastrophic loss to one of California’s most important industries, the Legislature declares that this chapter is in the interest of the public health and welfare.

(h) The Legislature further declares that it is in the interest of the public health and welfare that the districts authorized to be created by this chapter not duplicate existing services already being provided to grape growers by the University of California Cooperative Extension Farm Advisor or the county agricultural commissioners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6200.5.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Winegrape Pest and Disease Control District Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.

It is the purpose of this chapter to make available a procedure for the organization, operation, government, and dissolution of districts to respond to, manage, and control the effects of the spread of the phylloxera pest, and other pests that attack winegrape plants, and to collect and disseminate to winegrape producers in the district all relevant information and scientific studies concerning the pest or pests, as well as to chart and determine the extent and location of any infestations.

Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code does not apply to districts organized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6202.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this section govern the construction of this chapter.

(a) “Board” or “board of directors” means the board of directors of a district.

(b) “District” means a winegrape pest and disease control district organized pursuant to this chapter.

(c) “Owner” includes joint owner, coowner, guardian, executor, administrator, or any other person that holds property in a trust capacity under court appointment.

(d) “Phylloxera,” Daktulosphaira vitifoliae, is an aphid-like pest in the family of Phylloxeridae that attacks winegrape plants (Vitus sp.).

(e) “Winegrapes” means grapes produced that are intended to be converted from their fresh form into grape juice, grape concentrate, wine, or products thereof, including, but not limited to, high proof and brandy produced from winegrapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Formation of Districts [6210. - 6223.]

6210.

Proceedings for the formation of a district within any county shall be commenced by a petition that is either of the following:

(a) Signed by 50 percent or more of the growers who own 65 percent or more of the affected land.

(b) Signed by 65 percent or more of the growers who own 50 percent or more of the affected land.

The petition shall be addressed to, and filed with, the board of supervisors of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6211.

The petition may be filed in sections, each of which shall comply with all the requirements for a petition, except that a section need not contain the total number of signatures required for the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6212.

Signatures to the petition may be withdrawn at any time before it has been acted upon by filing with the clerk of the board of supervisors a declaration signed by the petitioner that states that it is the intention of the petitioner to withdraw his or her signature from the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6213.

(a) The petition shall state the name of the proposed district and shall set forth its boundaries or describe the lands to be included.

(b) It is a sufficient designation of the boundaries of a proposed district to recite that all the grape acreage in the county is to be included in the district, or that all the grape acreage in a designated area within the county is to be included in the district.

(c) If either designation is used, the outside boundary of the area so designated is the boundary of the district, and the district shall include all area within the outside boundary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6214.

(a) Upon the presentation and filing of a petition, the board of supervisors shall refer the petition to the county agricultural commissioner for the preparation of a register of owners of winegrape acreage within the proposed district, and for an investigation and report.

(b) The agricultural commissioner shall create a register of all winegrape acreage owners within the proposed district describing the net acreage of land devoted to the growing of winegrapes by each grower. The commissioner shall file with the register a report and recommendation to the board of supervisors on whether conditions of the phylloxera or other pest or disease warrant the board of supervisors proceeding with the organization of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6215.

(a) The board of supervisors shall fix a time and place for the hearing of the petition.

(b) The hearing shall not be less than 20 days, or more than 40 days, after the filing of the petition with the board of supervisors.

(c) The board of supervisors shall order the clerk of the board of supervisors to give notice of the time and place fixed for the hearing upon the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6216.

The notice of hearing shall do all of the following:

(a) State the name of the district and that it is being formed for the control of winegrape pests and diseases.

(b) State the petition is available for inspection at the office of the clerk of the board of supervisors.

(c) Designate the boundaries of the proposed district in substantially the same way that they are described in the petition.

(d) State the time and place for the hearing.

(e) State that at the hearing protests will be considered by the board of supervisors.

(f) State that requests in writing for the exclusion of lands from, or the inclusion of lands in, the proposed district, will be heard and considered by the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6217.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation published and circulated in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6218.

The notice shall be published once a week for two successive weeks prior to the date set for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6219.

At the hearing, the report of the county agricultural commissioner shall be received. Protests may be made orally or in writing by any person interested in the formation of the proposed district. Any protest that pertains to the regularity or sufficiency of the proceedings shall be in writing and shall clearly set forth the irregularities and defects to which objection is made. All written protests shall be filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors on or before the time fixed for the final hearing. The hearing may be continued from time to time, not to exceed 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6220.

At the hearing, any owner of winegrape acreage in the proposed district may present to the board of supervisors a request, in writing, for the exclusion of that land or any part of that land from the proposed district upon a showing that the land or part of that land will not be benefited by the activities of the proposed district. Factors that the board of supervisors may consider in its determination to exclude shall include an affidavit from the landowner stating that the land has already been affected by phylloxera or other winegrape plant pests or diseases and the winegrape plants have been removed from the land, that more than 66 percent of the subject parcel is planted with non-vinifera-crossed rootstock, including, but not limited to, St. George, S04, 5C, or 5BB rootstock, or that the subject parcel does not have a pest or disease problem that can be controlled by the district. Any owner of winegrape acreage outside the proposed district may present to the board of supervisors a request in writing for inclusion of that land in the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6221.

If the board of supervisors determines that the petition does not comply with the requirements of law, the matter may be dismissed without prejudice to present a new petition covering the same matter. A finding by the board of supervisors in favor of the sufficiency of the petition and notice is final and conclusive against all persons except the state in a proceeding brought by the Attorney General within one year of the date of the making of the order establishing and describing the boundaries of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6222.

(a) If the board of supervisors determines that the project is feasible and in the interest of the winegrape growers of the county, the board of supervisors shall, by order entered in its minutes, declare the district duly organized under the name designated in the petition for the formation of the district.

(b) The order shall describe the territory included in the district and, if the board of supervisors does not exclude or include land pursuant to Section 6223, it is a sufficient description of the territory to describe the boundaries in substantially the same way as they are described in the petition.

(c) A copy of the order duly certified by the clerk of the board of supervisors shall be filed for record in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6223.

(a) In determining the boundaries of the district, the board of supervisors shall exclude from the district any winegrape acreage that it finds will not be benefited by the proposed project, and it may include in the district any lands that it finds will be benefited if it also finds it will be in the interest of the district to include these lands. The inclusion may be upon application of the owner or, without the owner’s application, upon giving the owner notice of the proposed inclusion and an opportunity for a hearing on the inclusion.

(b) Notice of inclusion shall be mailed, postage prepaid, by the clerk of the board of supervisors, to the address of the owner of the land as shown by the last equalized county assessment roll, and to any person that has filed with the clerk that person’s name and address and description of land in which he or she has either a legal or equitable interest. The notice shall describe the land proposed to be included, and shall state the time and place at which objections to the inclusion will be heard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Organization of Districts [6230. - 6237.]

6230.

Upon the adoption of the order of organization, the board of supervisors shall immediately appoint a board of directors of five members to administer the affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6231.

In order to be eligible to be a director of the district, a person shall be a citizen of the United States and of this state, and an owner of lands included in the district that are devoted, in whole or in part, to the growing of the product for which the district is established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6232.

Upon his or her appointment, each director shall, in the manner provided by law, subscribe the oath of office and file the oath with the county clerk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6233.

(a) From and after the filing for record of the order of the board of supervisors declaring the district organized, and the appointment and qualification of its first board of directors, the organization of the district is complete. The district shall operate for a period of five years from the date of its organization, and shall cease to exist after five years unless the district is reauthorized and approved by the board of supervisors.

(b) The board of directors shall hold a public hearing six months prior to termination of its initial organization or last reauthorization to determine whether the conditions of the phylloxera or other pest or disease determined pursuant to Section 6214 warrant the reauthorization of the district for an additional five years. The notice of hearing shall state the name of the district and that consideration is being given to reauthorizing the district for an additional five years, the boundaries of the district, and the time and place for the hearing. Notice of the hearing shall be given as provided in Sections 6217 and 6218. The board of directors shall submit the record of the hearing and its recommendation to the board of supervisors within 90 days of the hearing. The board of supervisors shall approve or reject the recommendation; if it rejects the recommendation, the board of supervisors shall return the report accompanied by its reasons for the rejection to the board of directors within 30 days of receipt. The board of directors may thereafter address the reasons for rejection by the board of supervisors and submit an amended report and new recommendations for reauthorization for approval or rejection by the board of supervisors, unless the district has ceased to exist pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6234.

(a) Immediately after the organization of the district, the directors shall meet and organize as a board and shall elect a chairperson, vice chairperson and secretary from among their own number.

(b) The chairperson shall call and preside at all meetings of the board, sign all warrants drawn on the county treasurer, and all contracts and other documents, and the minutes of all meetings at which the chairperson is present. In case of the chairperson’s absence from a meeting, the vice chairperson shall act as chairperson pro tempore. The vice chairperson may sign warrants in place of the chairperson if the chairperson is absent from a meeting or unavailable. The secretary shall give notice of and keep the minutes of all meetings and prepare and have custody of all records and papers, and have custody of the seal of the district. The secretary shall attest all warrants drawn on the county treasury, all contracts and other documents, and shall sign the minutes of all meetings at which he or she is present. The secretary shall prepare the annual reports and any other reports required by the board and shall prepare all notices and all calls for bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6235.

The members of the board shall serve for terms of one year, or for a longer term as determined by the board of supervisors, and until the appointment and qualification of their successors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6236.

Upon the expiration of the term of any member of the board, the board of supervisors shall appoint the successor. Vacancies shall be filled by the board of supervisors for the unexpired term.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6237.

The members of the board shall not receive any compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses, when claims for those expenses have been approved by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of the District [6240. - 6246.]

6240.

The district may do all of the following:

(a) Sue and be sued in all actions and proceedings in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(b) Adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(c) Take by grant, purchase, gift, devise, lease, or otherwise, and hold, use and enjoy, and lease, or otherwise dispose of, real and personal property of every kind and description within or without the district necessary to the full and convenient exercise of its powers.
